Hawaii, session 2026, SB2372.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 58, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding five new sections to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§58-A  Definitions.  As used in this chapter: "County arborist advisory committee" means a county-level arborist advisory committee established pursuant to section 58‑2. "Exceptional tree" means a tree, or a stand or grove of trees that has been designated by a county arborist advisory committee pursuant to section 58-B. "Significant tree" means a tree designated by a county arborist advisory committee pursuant to section 58-C. "State arborist advisory committee" means the state-level arborist advisory committee established pursuant to section 58-D. §58-B  Exceptional tree selection criteria.  A county arborist advisory committee shall use the following base criteria to designate exceptional trees: (1)  Age. (A)  Non-specific age.  A tree that has reached a notable age without regard to a specific minimum threshold value. (B)  Species-specific age.  A tree that has reached an age threshold determined by species to account for the varying longevity of different species. (2)  Aesthetics. (A)  Outstanding example of a species.  A visually impressive tree that stands out from others and represents the optimal form of a species. (B)  Form, structure, or morphology.  A tree that displays an iconic physical appearance, unique form features, or other impressive characteristics that set it apart from other trees. (C)  Landmark.  A tree that is visually dominant in the landscape and contributes aesthetically to the local area. (D)  Collection.  A grove, avenue, or alley of trees that are grouped together to provide an exceptional example of the species. (3)  Benefits. (A)  Ecological benefits.  A tree that provides substantial benefits to organisms within its ecosystem. (B)  Environmental benefits.  A tree that provides substantial benefits to the surrounding environment, including carbon sequestration, stormwater runoff reduction, erosion reduction, shading, pollutant removal, and urban heat island reduction. (C)  Sociocultural benefits.  A tree that provides substantial benefits in the form of cultural ecosystem services, including place‑based knowledge and education and promotion of physical or mental well-being. (D)  Economic benefits.  A tree that provides substantial economic benefits to a geographic region, such as through ecotourism. (4)  Botanical and biological value. (A)  Unique or exceptional value.  A tree that has unique or exceptional botanical, horticultural, arboricultural, or biological value or is a valuable source for future propagation efforts due to its genetic components. (B)  Endangered.  A tree that is valued based on its endangered status worldwide. (C)  Rarity.  A tree that is rare due to its infrequent occurrence worldwide. (D)  Endemic status.  A tree that is of a species endemic to the State; provided that a tree nominated because of endemic status shall also possess at least one other exceptional tree criterion to be considered for exceptional tree designation. (E)  Relic specimen.  A tree that is a relic of a former ecosystem. (5)  Cultural value. (A)  Cultural value.  A tree that represents a wide range of cultural aspects and values that benefit a community or specific culture, including an association with past and current groups, that provides a sense of place for those in a local community, or that acts as a fundamental component of a community's identity. (B)  Social or community value.  A tree that is well-known and prominent in the community and provides a connection for those who interact with it. (C)  Religious or spiritual value.  A tree that is associated with religious or spiritual practices. (D)  Legends and oral histories.  A tree that is associated with a legend or oral history, including through depictions in stories, songs, or dances. (6)  Historical value. (A)  Historical value.  A tree that is associated with a historical place, event, or date that made a lasting and important contribution to an area. (B)  Historic person or memorial planting.  A tree that was planted for, by, or in association with a historically important person, event, group, or institution. (C)  Represented in historical documents.  A tree that is referenced or visually depicted in historical documents. (D)  Historical witness.  A tree that witnessed, was a part of, or was located at the site of an important historical or cultural event. (7)  Size. (A)  Species-specific size.  A tree that has reached a notable size over a specific threshold in comparison to other trees of its species. (B)  Champion size.  A tree that represents the largest physical metrics for a species in a county arborist advisory committee's geographic region based on measurements of height, circumference, or canopy spread.  A single tree may be the champion in multiple categories. (C)  Non-specific size.  A tree that has reached a notable size without regard to a specific minimum threshold value. Exceptional trees may be designated generally by biotaxy or individually by location or class. §58-C  Significant tree designation; established.  (a) There is established a statewide recognition program for significant trees as a tier two classification under the exceptional trees program, for education and outreach purposes only. Significant tree designations shall be made to promote awareness, education, and community engagement relating to the value of the State's tree canopy.  Significant trees may later be designated as exceptional trees. (b)  Significant trees shall be evaluated using the selection criteria pursuant to section 58-B.  Significant trees shall exhibit one or more of the selection criteria, but to a lesser extent than the threshold required to be designated as an exceptional tree. (c)  The designation of a significant tree shall be made by a county arborist advisory committee.  Applications for recognition may be submitted by individuals, organizations, or government agencies.  Approval or denial of a significant tree designation shall be determined by a majority vote of a county arborist advisory committee. (d)  Designation as a significant tree shall neither impose additional regulatory obligations nor provide tax benefits to property owners. §58-D  State arborist advisory committee; established.  There is established the state arborist advisory committee within the department of land and natural resources for administrative purposes, which shall consist of no less than nine and no more than thirteen members.  Members of the state arborist advisory committee shall be appointed by the governor and shall include: (1)  A representative from each county arborist advisory committee; and (2)  No less than five and no more than eight individuals with expertise in arboriculture, urban forestry, landscape architecture, cultural or historical knowledge, and community engagement. §58-E  State arborist advisory committee; powers and duties.  For the purposes of this chapter, the state arborist advisory committee shall have the following powers and duties: (1)  To oversee the State's exceptional tree program, including the development, coordination, and implementation of a strategic state exceptional and significant trees master plan.  The state arborist advisory committee shall provide the master plan to each county arborist advisory committee; (2)  To serve as a resource to county arborist advisory committees to ensure consistent and standardized implementation of exceptional and significant tree laws; (3)  To produce a statewide exceptional and significant tree registry that shall be updated annually to reflect the status of exceptional and significant trees throughout the State; (4)  To advise the governor, legislature, and state departments and agencies on exceptional and significant trees, urban forestry, and other tree-related issues; and (5)  To work in conjunction with community groups to develop and implement educational campaigns to increase public awareness of the exceptional tree program.  Campaigns may use websites, brochures, social media platforms, and interactive tools to complement community workshops and presentations." SECTION 2.  Chapter 58, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "CHAPTER 58 EXCEPTIONAL TREES PROGRAM [[]§58-1[]] Purpose.  It is the policy of the State to safeguard exceptional trees from destruction due to improper land development, and the legislature finds that enactment of protective regulations by the State and counties to accomplish this is a valid and important public purpose.  The legislature further finds that the establishment of state- and county-level arborist advisory committees, additional selection criteria, and significant tree designations are necessary to ensure cohesion in safeguarding the State's environmental, cultural, historical, economic, and aesthetic values. §58-2 County arborist advisory committees; establishment.  Each county of the State shall establish a county arborist advisory committee[, whose] consisting of at least five members.  The members of each county arborist advisory committee shall be appointed by the mayor and shall include: (1)  The county planning director, or the director's designee; (2)  [One] At least one member who shall be a person actively employed in the practice of landscape architecture, a certified arborist, a horticulturist with specialization in trees, or a person who has received a master's degree in botany; and (3)  [Not] No less than three other members selected on the basis of active participation in programs of community beautification, or research or organization in the ecological sciences, including but not limited to botany, ethnobotany, horticulture, geography, tropical plant and soil science, or Hawaiiana. §58-3  County arborist advisory committees; powers and duties.  For the purposes of this chapter, the county arborist advisory committees shall have the following powers and duties in addition to those delegated by the respective county councils: (1)  To research, prepare, and recommend to the county council exceptional trees to be protected by county ordinance or regulation[.]; (2)  To advise property owners relative to the preservation and enhancement of exceptional trees[.]; (3)  To recommend to the county council appropriate protective ordinances, regulations, and procedures[.] relative to all trees within the county; (4)  To review all actions deemed by the county council to endanger exceptional trees[.]; and (5)  To identify and promote significant trees located within the county. [For the purposes of this section, "exceptional trees" means a tree or stand or grove of trees with historic or cultural value, or which by reason of its age, rarity, location, size, esthetic quality, or endemic status has been designated by the county committee as worthy of preservation.  The term "exceptional trees" does not apply to trees planted for commercial forestry operations in each county within the State.  Exceptional trees may be designated generally by biotaxy or individually by location or class. []§58-4[]]  County protective regulations.  Each county shall enact appropriate protective regulations [which designate] that: (1)  Designate exceptional trees[; provide] pursuant to section 58-B; (2)  Provide for special county review [prior to] before destruction of exceptional trees, whether by removal or the existence of conditions [which] that lead to the destruction of [such] the trees; [provide] (3)  Provide for site plan review and amendment to protect exceptional trees; and [provide] (4)  Provide for injunctive relief against the removal or destruction of exceptional trees. §58-5  State assistance.  The department of land and natural resources and the [University] university of Hawaii shall cooperate with and to the fullest extent possible assist the State and counties and their respective arborist advisory committees in carrying out the purposes of this chapter." SECTION 3.  Section 235-19, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (d) to read as follows: "(d)  For the purpose of this section, [the term] "exceptional tree" [shall have] has the same meaning as [defined] in section [58-3.] 58-A." SECTION 4.  In codifying the new sections added by section 1 of this Act, and as referenced in sections 2 and 3 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating the new sections in this Act. SECTION 5.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.